Louisiana, session 2026, HB171.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 323(A) and 324(A) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 323. Secured personal surety
A. A secured personal surety is a personal surety who satisfies all the
requirements of Article 311(5) and specifically mortgages immovable property
located in the state of Louisiana.
* * *
Art. 324. Unsecured personal surety
A. A person in custody may be released by order of the court on an
unsecured personal surety bail undertaking. An unsecured personal surety is a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 171 ENROLLED
personal surety where the surety satisfies all the requirements of Article 311(5) and
lives and resides in the state of Louisiana without specifically mortgaging or giving
a security interest in any property as security to guarantee the surety's performance.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.